tests/plural.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "the various combinations":
    куорат<n><px3sg><nom> : куората
    куорат<n><px3pl><nom> : куораттара
    куорат<n><pl><px3sg><nom> : куораттара
    куорат<n><pl><px3pl><nom> : куораттара
